Alaska, session 34, HB199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 07 to read: 08 ALASKA COMMERCIAL FISHING AND AGRICULTURE BANK; LOANS. (a) 09 Subject to legislative appropriation, the Department of Commerce, Community, and 10 Economic Development shall purchase nonvoting, preferred shares issued by the Alaska 11 Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank established under AS 44.81.010 for the purpose of 12 enabling the bank to make loans to persons involved in the state's commercial fishing industry 13 under AS 44.81.215. Except as provided in (d) of this section, the bank shall repurchase 14 shares the department purchased under this section 20 years after the purchase. If the bank 01 fails to repurchase the shares 20 years after the purchase by the department, the commissioner 02 of commerce, community, and economic development may appoint a receiver to direct, 03 manage, and operate the bank until the shares have been repurchased. Upon voluntary or 04 involuntary liquidation of the bank, and upon repayment of all legal debts and obligations of 05 the bank, all nonvoting, preferred shares owned by the department have priority for 06 redemption over all other forms and amounts of ownership of the bank. 07 (b) A loan made by the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank using funds 08 provided by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development's 09 purchase of shares under this section 10 (1) shall have a fixed term of 15 years; 11 (2) shall have a fixed interest rate; 12 (3) may not bear interest 13 (A) exceeding the prime rate, as defined in AS 44.88.599, plus 14 two percentage points; or 15 (B) at a rate of more than 5.25 percent a year. 16 (c) On the effective date of sec. 4, ch. 25, SLA 2024, the Alaska Commercial Fishing 17 and Agriculture Bank shall provide the division within the Department of Commerce, 18 Community, and Economic Development that is responsible for banking and securities a list 19 of each loan originated or refinanced under (b) of this section, with confidential borrower 20 information redacted. The list must include, for each loan, 21 (1) the loan number, principal balance, interest rate, and loan term; 22 (2) a copy of the loan agreement; 23 (3) an amortization schedule, including the comparison made under (4) of this 24 subsection; 25 (4) a comparison of 26 (A) the loan's baseline interest earnings, calculated as the projection of 27 the refinanced or originated loan's interest using the principal and the interest rate in 28 effect for the loan before it was refinanced, or the interest rate and term that the loan 29 would have had if the loan had not been made by the Alaska Commercial Fishing and 30 Agriculture Bank under (b) of this section, amortized over a 15-year term assuming 31 timely loan payments; and 01 (B) the loan's post-refinance or post-origination interest earnings, 02 calculated as the loan's projected interest earnings using the loan's principal, the loan's 03 actual interest rate as originated or refinanced under (b) of this section, and a 15-year 04 term assuming timely loan repayments; and 05 (5) any other information that the division may need to complete the review. 06 (d) Within 120 days after the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank 07 provides the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development the list 08 required under (c) of this section, the department shall conduct a one-time review of the listed 09 information. If the department determines that the difference in projected interest earnings for 10 all loans originated or refinanced under (b) of this section for the Alaska Commercial Fishing 11 and Agriculture Bank, as calculated under (c) of this section, is less than the par value of the 12 shares purchased by the department under (a) of this section, the department shall request that 13 the bank repay the difference to the department by buying back the requisite quantity of 14 shares. 15 (e) If the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 16 requests that the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank buy back the shares under 17 (d) of this section, the bank shall buy back the shares within 30 days. 18 (f) Subject to appropriation, the department shall purchase shares issued by the 19 Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank under (a) of this section using an amount 20 equal to the amount that was in the former Alaska capstone avionics revolving loan fund 21 (former AS 44.33.650 - 44.33.690) and was unobligated on July 1, 2020. 22 * Sec. 2. Section 1 of this Act is repealed July 1, 2027. 23 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.